Utah statutes.
9-8-502.   Legislative finding.

The Legislature finds and declares that preservation and restoration of historically significant real property and structures as identified by the State Register of Historic Sites are in the public interest of the people of the state of Utah and should be promoted by the laws of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

